Vermont, session 2025-2026, H342.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
16 Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND PURPOSE
17 (a) The General Assembly finds that Vermont’s judges, prosecutors, law
18 enforcement officers, and other public servants play an essential role in the
19 functioning of the government of the State of Vermont and that the nature of

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 2 of 29
1 their official duties regularly places them in danger of death, serious physical
2 injury, and other reprisals from members of the public.
3 (b) Violence to and intimidation of such public servants and their families
4 is on the rise and public access to the personal information of these individuals
5 can be and has been used to facilitate violence and intimidation. The personal
6 information of these individuals is of negligible value to the public interest or
7 public discourse.
8 (c) Accordingly, the provisions of this act are both necessary and
9 appropriate to protect the privacy, safety, and security of public servants and to
10 prevent interference in the administration of justice and the operation of
11 government in the State of Vermont.
12 Sec. 2. 9 V.S.A. chapter 62 is amended to read:
13 CHAPTER 62. PROTECTION OF PERSONALINFORMATION
14 * * *
15 Subchapter 5. Data Brokers
16 * * *
17 § 2448. NONDISCLOSURE OF CERTAIN PUBLIC SERVANT
18 PERSONALINFORMATION
19 (a) Definitions. As used in this section:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 3 of 29
1 (1) “Assignee” means a person or entity to whom a covered person’s
2 right to bring a civil action for a violation of this section has been assigned by
3 the covered person or their authorized agent.
4 (2) “Authorized agent” means any of the following persons or entities
5 authorized to submit or revoke a request for the redaction or nondisclosure of
6 protected information on behalf of a covered person and to engage in
7 communications and enforcement related to the request:
8 (A) a designated trustee or other agent pursuant to a written power of
9 attorney or other legal instrument on behalf of any covered person who is
10 physically or mentally incapacitated;
11 (B) a parent or legal guardian on behalf of any child who is a minor
12 and who is otherwise entitled to address redaction or nondisclosure pursuant to
13 this section; and
14 (C) a person or entity who has been appointed pursuant to a notarized
15 document by a covered person to act for the covered person for the submission
16 or revocation of requests for redaction or nondisclosure of protected
17 information.
18 (3) “Covered person” means any of the following individuals:
19 (A) active or former judges, law enforcement officers, prosecutors,
20 public defenders, parole and probation officers, municipal employees, and

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 4 of 29
1 employees of the Family Services Division of the Department for Children and
2 Families; and
3 (B) the immediate family of individuals identified in subdivision (A)
4 of this subdivision (3).
5 (4) “Data broker” has the same meaning as set forth in section 2430 of
6 this title. “Data broker” as used in this section shall exclude governmental
7 agencies and their representatives acting in their official capacities.
8 (5) “Disclose” or “disclosing” means to solicit, sell, manufacture, give,
9 provide, lend, trade, mail, deliver, transfer, post, publish, distribute, circulate,
10 disseminate, present, exhibit, advertise, offer, or include within a searchable
11 list or database, regardless of whether any person has actually searched the list
12 or database.
13 (6) “Home address” means a partial or complete street address or other
14 information that reveals a home’s location, including taxparcel ID, legal
15 property description, or geographic coordinates.
16 (7) “Home telephone number” means any telephone number used
17 primarily for personal communications, including a landline or cellular
18 telephone number.
19 (8) “Immediate family” has the same meaning as in 3 V.S.A. § 1201.
20 (9) “Judge” means any justice, judge, or magistrate of the Vermont
21 Supreme Court, Superior Court, or Vermont Judicial Bureau, and any judge or

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 5 of 29
1 magistrate of a federal court located in Vermont, or any person who serves as a
2 judge, justice, or magistrate in another state who maintains a home address in
3 Vermont.
4 (10) “Law enforcement officer” has the same meaning as in 20 V.S.A.
5 § 2351a.
6 (11) “Municipal employee” has the same meaning as in 21 V.S.A.
7 § 1722.
8 (12) “Parole and probation officer” means a corrections services
9 specialist employed by the Department of Corrections or a parole or probation
10 officer employed by a Vermont county or municipality.
11 (13) “Prosecutor” means a Vermont State’s Attorney or Deputy State’s
12 Attorney, or a U.S. Attorney or an Assistant U.S. Attorney.
13 (14) “Protected information” means a covered person’s:
14 (A) home address, including primary residence and any secondary
15 residences;
16 (B) home telephone number;
17 (C) personal email address;
18 (D) Social Security number or driver’s license number; and
19 (E) license plate number or other unique identifiers of a vehicle
20 owned, leased, or regularly used by a covered person.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 6 of 29
1 (15) “Public defender” means the Defender General, Deputy Defender
2 General, public defenders, or deputy public defenders that provide legal
3 services to persons in need as set forth in 13 V.S.A. chapter 163.
4 (b) Nondisclosure of protected information.
5 (1) A covered person or an authorized agent of the covered person has
6 the right through this section to send a notice to a data broker requesting that
7 the data broker cease disclosure or redisclosure of the covered person’s
8 protected information.
9 (2) Upon a data broker receiving physical or electronic notice from a
10 covered person, or an authorized agent of the covered person, requesting that
11 the data broker cease disclosing or redisclosing protected information of the
12 covered person, the data broker shall cease disclosing the protected
13 information not later than 10 days after receipt of the notice and shall not
14 disclose or redisclose the protected information after that time.
15 (3) The notice as set forth in subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be
16 in a form provided by the Secretary of State, except that no prior verification
17 of a covered person’s or authorized agent’s status shall be required for the
18 notice. The Secretary of State shall publish the form of notice not later than
19 90 days after July 1, 2025, provided that until such form is published, covered
20 persons and their authorized agents may use their own form of written notice
21 that references this section, identifies the sender as a covered person or an

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 7 of 29
1 authorized agent acting on behalf of a covered person, and requests that the
2 data broker cease disclosure of the covered person’s protected information.
3 (4) A data broker that receives a notice from a covered person or the
4 authorized agent of the covered person pursuant to subdivision (2) of this
5 subsection that discloses or rediscloses the covered person’s protected
6 information more than 10 business days after receiving the notice is in
7 violation of this section and shall be subject to the following penalties in a
8 civil action brought in Superior Court by the covered person or the covered
9 person’s assignee:
10 (A) damages, calculated as the greater of actual damages or
11 liquidated damages computed at the rate of $1,000.00 for each violation of this
12 section;
13 (B) punitive damages upon proof of willful or reckless disregard of
14 the law;
15 (C) reasonable attorney’s fees and other litigation costs reasonably
16 incurred; and
17 (D) any other preliminary and equitable relief as the court determines
18 to be appropriate.
19 (5) In any judicial proceeding pursuant to subdivision (4) of this
20 subsection, the standard of fault shall be ordinary negligence. It shall not be a
21 defense to liability in a judicial proceeding that the covered person’s protected

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 8 of 29
1 information is or was available to the public from other sources, on the internet
2 or otherwise, or available by inspection of public records.
3 (6) A covered person or an authorized agent accessing a data broker’s
4 website or other public application for the purpose of determining whether the
5 covered person’s protected information is being disclosed shall not, as a result
6 of such access, be deemed to have agreed on behalf of the covered person to
7 any website terms and conditions with respect to the covered person’s rights
8 under this section.
9 (7) A disclosure of protected information shall not constitute a violation
10 of this section if the disclosure:
11 (A) is made with the express authorization of the covered person,
12 provided that the authorization is provided subsequent to the relevant
13 nondisclosure request; or
14 (B) is for the sole purpose of facilitating a transaction initiated by the
15 covered person.
16 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
17 This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND PURPOSE
(a) The General Assembly finds that Vermont’s judges, prosecutors, law
enforcement officers, and other public servants play an essential role in the
functioning of the government of the State of Vermont and that the nature of

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 9 of 29
their official duties regularly places them in danger of death, serious physical
injury, and other reprisals from members of the public.
(b) Violence to and intimidation of such public servants and their families
is on the rise and public access to the personal information of these individuals
can be and has been used to facilitate violence and intimidation. The personal
information of these individuals is of negligible value to the public interest or
public discourse.
(c) Accordingly, the provisions of this act are both necessary and
appropriate to protect the privacy, safety, and security of public servants and
to prevent interference in the administration of justice and the operation of
government in the State of Vermont.
Sec. 2. 9 V.S.A. chapter 62 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 62. PROTECTION OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
* * *
Subchapter 5. Data Brokers
* * *
§ 2448. NONDISCLOSURE OF CERTAIN PUBLIC SERVANT
PERSONAL INFORMATION
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 10 of 29
(1) “Assignee” means a person or entity to whom a covered person’s
right to bring a civil action for a violation of this section has been assigned by
the covered person or their authorized agent.
(2) “Authorized agent” means any of the following persons or entities
authorized to submit or revoke a request for the redaction or nondisclosure of
protected information on behalf of a covered person and to engage in
communications and enforcement related to the request:
(A) a designated trustee or other agent pursuant to a written power
of attorney or other legal instrument on behalf of any covered person who is
physically or mentally incapacitated;
(B) a parent or legal guardian on behalf of any child who is a minor
and who is otherwise entitled to address redaction or nondisclosure pursuant
to this section; and
(C) a person or entity who has been appointed pursuant to a
notarized document by a covered person to act for the covered person for the
submission or revocation of requests for redaction or nondisclosure of
protected information.
(3) “Covered person” means any of the following individuals:
(A) active or former judges, law enforcement officers, federal law
enforcement officers, prosecutors, public defenders, parole and probation
officers, and members of the Vermont Parole Board;

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 11 of 29
(B) employees of:
(i) the Family Services Division of the Department for Children
and Families;
(ii) the Vermont Human Rights Commission;
(iii) the Department of Corrections;
(iv) the Department of Public Safety, including the Vermont State
Police;
(v) the Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs; and
(vi) all courts in the State;
(C) investigators, victim advocates, mental health crisis workers, and
embedded crisis specialists that are employed or work on a contract basis for
any of the entities listed in subdivision (3)(B) of this subsection; and
(D) the immediate family of individuals identified in subdivisions
(A)–(C) of this subdivision (3).
(4) “Data broker” has the same meaning as set forth in section 2430 of
this title. As used in this section, “data broker” shall exclude governmental
agencies and their representatives acting in their official capacities.
(5) “Disclose,” “disclosing,” or “disclosure” means to solicit, sell,
manufacture, give, provide, lend, trade, mail, deliver, transfer, post, publish,
distribute, circulate, disseminate, present, exhibit, advertise, offer, or include
within a searchable list or database, regardless of whether any person has

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 12 of 29
actually searched the list or database. “Disclose” does not include an
organization maintaining protected information completely inaccessible and
unviewable to any person outside of the organization.
(6) “Federal law enforcement officer” has the same meaning as in 18
U.S.C. § 115(c)(1) but is limited to those individuals who work or reside in
Vermont.
(7) “Home address” means a partial or complete street address or other
information that reveals a home’s location, including tax parcel ID, legal
property description, or geographic coordinates.
(8) “Home telephone number” means any telephone number used
primarily for personal communications, including a landline or cellular
telephone number.
(9) “Immediate family” has the same meaning as in 3 V.S.A. § 1201.
(10) “Judge” means any justice, judge, or magistrate of a State court or
of a federal court located in Vermont, or any person who serves as a judge,
justice, or magistrate in another state who maintains a home address in
Vermont.
(11) “Law enforcement officer” has the same meaning as in 20 V.S.A.
§ 2351a.
(12) “Parole and probation officer” means:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 13 of 29
(A) a corrections services specialist employed by the Department of
Corrections; or
(B) a parole or probation officer employed by a Vermont county or
municipality.
(13) “Prosecutor” means a Vermont State’s Attorney or Deputy State’s
Attorney, the Attorney General or an Assistant Attorney General, or a U.S.
Attorney or an Assistant U.S. Attorney who works in Vermont.
(14) “Protected information” means a covered person’s:
(A) home address, including primary residence and any secondary
residences;
(B) home telephone number;
(C) personal email address;
(D) Social Security number or driver’s license number; and
(E) license plate number or other unique identifiers of a vehicle
owned, leased, or regularly used by a covered person.
(15) “Public defender” means the Defender General, Deputy Defender
General, public defenders, or deputy public defenders who provide legal
services to persons in need as set forth in 13 V.S.A. chapter 163.
(b) Nondisclosure of protected information.
(1) A covered person or an authorized agent of the covered person has
the right through this section to send a notice to a data broker requesting that

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 14 of 29
the data broker cease disclosure or redisclosure of the covered person’s
protected information.
(2) Upon a data broker receiving physical or electronic notice from a
covered person, or an authorized agent of the covered person, requesting that
the data broker cease disclosing or redisclosing protected information of the
covered person, the data broker shall cease disclosing the protected
information not later than 15 days after receipt of the notice and shall not
disclose or redisclose the protected information after that time.
(3) The notice as set forth in subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be
in a form provided by the Secretary of State, except that no prior verification of
a covered person’s or authorized agent’s status shall be required for the
notice. The Secretary of State shall publish the form of notice not later than 90
days after July 1, 2025, provided that until such form is published, covered
persons and their authorized agents may use their own form of written notice
that references this section, identifies the sender as a covered person or an
authorized agent acting on behalf of a covered person, and requests that the
data broker cease disclosure of the covered person’s protected information.
(c) Remedies.
(1) A data broker that receives a notice from a covered person or the
authorized agent of the covered person pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) of this

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 15 of 29
section that discloses or rediscloses the covered person’s protected information
more than:
(A) 15 days after receiving the notice is in violation of this section
and shall be subject to an injunction in a civil action brought in Superior
Court by the covered person or the covered person’s assignee; or
(B) 30 days after receiving the notice is in violation of this section
and shall be subject to the following remedies in a civil action brought in
Superior Court by the covered person or the covered person’s assignee:
(i) damages, calculated as the greater of actual damages or
liquidated damages computed at the rate of $1,000.00 for each violation of
this section;
(ii) punitive damages upon proof of willful or reckless disregard of
the law;
(iii) reasonable attorney’s fees and other litigation costs
reasonably incurred; and
(iv) any other preliminary and equitable relief as the court
determines to be appropriate.
(2) In any judicial proceeding pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection, the standard of fault shall be ordinary negligence. It shall not be a
defense to liability in a judicial proceeding that the covered person’s protected

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 16 of 29
information is or was available to the public from other sources, on the
internet or otherwise, or available by inspection of public records.
(d) Accessing information. A covered person or an authorized agent
accessing a data broker’s website or other public application for the purpose
of determining whether the covered person’s protected information is being
disclosed shall not, as a result of such access, be deemed to have agreed on
behalf of the covered person to any website terms and conditions with respect
to the covered person’s rights under this section.
(e) Limitations.
(1) A disclosure of protected information shall not constitute a violation
of this section if the disclosure is:
(A) made with the express authorization of the covered person,
provided that the authorization is provided subsequent to the relevant
nondisclosure request; or
(B) for the sole purpose of facilitating a transaction initiated by the
covered person.
(2) This section does not apply to a data broker in a disclosure pursuant
to subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting an employer
from providing employee information to the Vermont Labor Relations Board or
to employee organizations that is required under Vermont law.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 17 of 29
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a data broker to
delete protected information.
Sec. 3. DELAYED START FOR CERTAIN REMEDIES
The remedies provided to a covered person pursuant to 9 V.S.A.
§ 2448(c)(1)(B) shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND PURPOSE
(a) The General Assembly finds that Vermont’s judges, prosecutors, law
enforcement officers, and other public servants play an essential role in the
functioning of the government of the State of Vermont and that the nature of
their official duties regularly places them in danger of death, serious physical
injury, and other reprisals from members of the public.
(b) Violence to and intimidation of such public servants and their families
is on the rise and public access to the personal information of these individuals
can be and has been used to facilitate violence and intimidation. The personal
information of these individuals is of negligible value to the public interest or
public discourse.
(c) Accordingly, the provisions of this act are both necessary and
appropriate to protect the privacy, safety, and security of public servants and

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 18 of 29
to prevent interference in the administration of justice and the operation of
government in the State of Vermont.
Sec. 2. 9 V.S.A. chapter 62 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 62. PROTECTION OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
* * *
Subchapter 5. Data Brokers
* * *
§ 2448. NONDISCLOSURE OF CERTAIN PUBLIC SERVANT
PERSONAL INFORMATION
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Authorized agent” means any of the following persons or entities
authorized to submit or revoke a request for the redaction or nondisclosure of
protected information on behalf of a covered person and to engage in
communications and enforcement related to the request:
(A) a designated trustee or other agent pursuant to a written power
of attorney or other legal instrument on behalf of any covered person who is
physically or mentally incapacitated;
(B) a parent or legal guardian on behalf of any child who is a minor
and who is otherwise entitled to address redaction or nondisclosure pursuant
to this section; and

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 19 of 29
(C) a person or entity who has been appointed pursuant to a
notarized document by a covered person to act for the covered person for the
submission or revocation of requests for redaction or nondisclosure of
protected information.
(2)(A) “Covered person” means any of the following individuals who
are either currently or formerly:
(i) a judge, law enforcement officer, federal law enforcement
officer, prosecutor, public defender, parole and probation officer, or member of
the Vermont Parole Board;
(ii) an employee of:
(I) the Family Services Division of the Department for Children
and Families;
(II) the Vermont Human Rights Commission;
(III) the Department of Corrections;
(IV) the Department of Public Safety, including the Vermont
State Police;
(V) the Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs; or
(VI) any court in the State; and
(iii) an investigator, victims advocate, mental health crisis worker,
or embedded crisis specialist that is employed by or works on a contract basis
for any of the entities listed in subdivision (ii) of this subdivision (a)(2)(A).

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 20 of 29
(B) “Covered person” also includes the immediate family of
individuals identified in subdivisions (A)(i)–(iii) of this subdivision (a)(2).
(3) “Data broker” has the same meaning as set forth in section 2430 of
this title. As used in this section, “data broker” excludes governmental
agencies and their representatives acting in their official capacities.
(4) “Disclose,” “disclosing,” or “disclosure” means to solicit, sell,
manufacture, give, provide, lend, trade, mail, deliver, transfer, post, publish,
distribute, circulate, disseminate, present, exhibit, advertise, offer, or include
within a searchable list or database, regardless of whether any person has
actually searched the list or database. “Disclose” does not include an
organization maintaining protected information completely inaccessible and
unviewable to any person outside of the organization.
(5) “Federal law enforcement officer” has the same meaning as in 18
U.S.C. § 115(c)(1) but is limited to those individuals who work or reside in
Vermont.
(6) “Home address” means a partial or complete street address or other
information that reveals a home’s location, including tax parcel ID, legal
property description, or geographic coordinates.
(7) “Home telephone number” means any telephone number used
primarily for personal communications, including a landline or cellular
telephone number.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 21 of 29
(8) “Immediate family” has the same meaning as in 3 V.S.A. § 1201.
(9) “Judge” means any justice, judge, or magistrate of a State court or
of a federal court located in Vermont, or any person who serves as a judge,
justice, or magistrate in another state who maintains a home address in
Vermont.
(10) “Law enforcement officer” has the same meaning as in 20 V.S.A.
§ 2351a.
(11) “Parole and probation officer” means:
(A) a corrections services specialist employed by the Department of
Corrections; or
(B) a parole or probation officer employed by a Vermont county or
municipality.
(12) “Prosecutor” means a Vermont State’s Attorney or Deputy State’s
Attorney, the Attorney General or an Assistant Attorney General, or a U.S.
Attorney or an Assistant U.S. Attorney who works in Vermont.
(13) “Protected information” means a covered person’s:
(A) home address, including primary residence and any secondary
residences;
(B) home telephone number;
(C) personal email address;
(D) Social Security number or driver’s license number; and

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 22 of 29
(E) license plate number or other unique identifiers of a vehicle
owned, leased, or regularly used by a covered person.
(14) “Public defender” means the Defender General, Deputy Defender
General, public defenders, or deputy public defenders who provide legal
services to persons in need as set forth in 13 V.S.A. chapter 163.
(b) Nondisclosure of protected information.
(1) A covered person or an authorized agent of the covered person has
the right through this section to send a notice to a data broker requesting that
the data broker cease disclosure or redisclosure of the covered person’s
protected information.
(2) Upon a data broker receiving physical or electronic notice from a
covered person, or an authorized agent of the covered person, requesting that
the data broker cease disclosing or redisclosing protected information of the
covered person, the data broker shall cease disclosing the protected
information not later than 15 days after receipt of the notice and shall not
disclose or redisclose the protected information after that time.
(3) The notice as set forth in subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be
in a form and manner provided by the Attorney General, except that:
(A) the notice shall require that the covered person provide the
covered person’s full name along with the specific protected information of the
covered person that is being disclosed by the data broker;

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 23 of 29
(B) no prior verification of a covered person’s or authorized agent’s
status shall be required for the notice; and
(C) the notice shall include a disclaimer that ceasing disclosure of a
covered person’s protected information may:
(i) complicate certain business transactions; and
(ii) not result in the covered person’s protected information being
totally removed from the internet.
(c) Penalties for violations.
(1) Attorney General enforcement.
(A) A data broker that receives a notice from a covered person or the
authorized agent of the covered person pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) of this
section that discloses or rediscloses the covered person’s protected information
more than 15 days after receiving the notice is in violation of this section and
shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $10,000.00 for each
violation.
(B) The Attorney General has the same authority to adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this section and to conduct civil investigations,
enter into assurances of discontinuance, bring civil actions, and take other
enforcement actions as provided under chapter 63, subchapter 1 of this title.
(C) The Attorney General shall create a form on its website where a
covered person or an authorized agent of the covered person is able to provide

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 24 of 29
notice to the Attorney General that more than 15 days have passed since the
covered person or an authorized agent of the covered person submitted a
notice to a data broker pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) of this section and that
the data broker continues to disclose or has redisclosed the covered person’s
protected information. This form shall require, at minimum, that the covered
person provide the name of the:
(i) data broker; and
(ii) covered person and the specific protected information of the
covered person that is being disclosed by the data broker.
(2) Private action.
(A) Subject to the requirements in subdivision (B) of this subdivision
(2), a data broker that receives a notice from a covered person or the
authorized agent of the covered person pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) of this
section and that discloses or rediscloses the covered person’s protected
information more than 15 days after receiving the notice is in violation of this
section and is subject to a civil action brought in Superior Court by the
covered person for the following:
(i) damages, calculated as the greater of actual damages or
liquidated damages computed at the rate of $1,000.00 for each violation of
this section;

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 25 of 29
(ii) punitive damages upon proof of willful or reckless disregard of
the law;
(iii) reasonable attorney’s fees and other litigation costs
reasonably incurred; and
(iv) any other preliminary and equitable relief as the court
determines to be appropriate.
(B) A data broker that ceases disclosing the protected information of
a covered person not more than 15 days after being served with process in a
civil suit brought by the covered person pursuant to subdivision (A) of this
subdivision (2) shall only be liable to the covered person for reasonable
attorney’s fees and court costs in the civil action. A data broker is not eligible
for the exception provided this subdivision (B) if the data broker:
(i) more than 15 days after receiving notice from a covered person
or the authorized agent of a covered person pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) of
this section discloses additional protected information of the covered person;
or
(ii) rediscloses protected information of the covered person after
having received notice pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) of this section.
(3) Standard of fault. In any judicial proceeding pursuant to this
section, the standard of fault shall be ordinary negligence. It shall not be a
defense to liability in a judicial proceeding that the covered person’s protected

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 26 of 29
information is or was available to the public from other sources, on the
internet or otherwise, or available by inspection of public records.
(d) Accessing information. A covered person or an authorized agent
accessing a data broker’s website or other public application for the purpose
of determining whether the covered person’s protected information is being
disclosed shall not, as a result of such access, be deemed to have agreed on
behalf of the covered person to any website terms and conditions with respect
to the covered person’s rights under this section.
(e) Limitations.
(1) A disclosure of protected information shall not constitute a violation
of this section if the disclosure is:
(A) made with the express or standing authorization of the covered
person, provided that the authorization is provided subsequent to the relevant
nondisclosure request; or
(B) for the sole purpose of facilitating a transaction initiated by the
covered person.
(2) This section does not apply to a data broker in a disclosure pursuant
to subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting an employer
from providing employee information to the Vermont Labor Relations Board or
to employee organizations that is required under Vermont law.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 27 of 29
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a data broker to
delete protected information.
Sec. 3. FORM OF NOTICE
The Attorney General shall publish the form of notice pursuant to 9 V.S.A.
§ 2448(b)(3) not later than 90 days after July 1, 2025, provided that until such
form is published, covered persons and their authorized agents may use their
own form of written notice that:
(1) references this section;
(2) identifies the sender as a covered person or an authorized agent
acting on behalf of a covered person;
(3) provides the covered person’s full name along with the specific
protected information of the covered person that is being disclosed by the data
broker; and
(4) requests that the data broker cease disclosing the specific protected
information of the covered person.
Sec. 4. STUDY AND REPORT ON PUBLIC AGENCY COMPLIANCE
(a) Study. The Agency of Digital Services, in consultation with the Agency
of Administration, the Office of the Secretary of State, the Office of the
Attorney General, and with other State agencies as requested by the Agency,
shall conduct a study to determine the various considerations and impacts on
State public agencies if public agencies were required to conform to the

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 28 of 29
disclosure policies set forth in this act. The Agency shall meet with and
receive input from relevant stakeholders in conducting its study, including the
Vermont League of Cities and Towns and the Vermont Municipal Clerks’ and
Treasurers’ Association. The Agency shall consider the following in its study:
(1) if public agencies were required to cease disclosing the protected
information of covered persons:
(A) the extent to which public agencies would currently be able to
accommodate these requests;
(B) the fiscal and resource impact on public agencies;
(C) whether additional staffing or training would be needed to
comply;
(D) the degree to which risk can be mitigated through State or local
policy; and
(E) determining which statutes, regulations, and administrative
policies require amending in order to accomplish the goal of public agencies
being able to cease the disclosure of protected information of covered persons;
(2) how other states have implemented similar requirements on their
public agencies, including the types of penalties levied for noncompliance;
(3) the feasibility of creating a State office to manage all statewide
requests to cease disclosing protected information; and
(4) any additional related areas of study as determined by the Agency.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.342
2025 Page 29 of 29
(b) Report. On or before December 1, 2026, the Agency of Digital Services
shall submit a written report to the House Committee on Government
Operations and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on Government
Operations with a summary of its findings pursuant to the study set forth in
subsection (a) of this section. The Agency shall also include in its report its
recommendations for legislative action and policy modification as well as a
suggested timeline for the implementation of the disclosure policies on public
agencies.
Sec. 5. DELAYED START FOR PRIVATE ACTION
The private action provided to a covered person pursuant to 9 V.S.A.
§ 2448(c)(2) shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.